South Dakota, session 2026, HB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a previously paid claim may be
recouped, recovered, or retroactively denied by the health carrier only within eighteen
months from the date the claim payment was made, if the health carrier has provided
written notice of the reason to the provider. This limitation does not apply to a previously
paid claim that:
(1) Was determined by the health carrier to have been submitted fraudulently or to
involve waste or abuse;
(2) Is the subject of an adjustment with a different health carrier, administrator, or
payor, and the adjustment is not affected by a contractual relationship, association,
or affiliation involving claims payment, processing, or pricing;
(3) Was for medical services covered by casualty insurance, as defined by §§ 58-9-11
to 58-9-27, inclusive;
(4) Was for medical services covered by a self-insured health plan governed by the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA), 29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 to
1461, inclusive (July 6, 2012);
(5) Was for medical services covered under medicare, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395-1395lll,
inclusive (March 15, 2025), medicaid, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 to 1396w-6, inclusive
(July 4, 2025), or any other federal law;
(6) Was for medical services covered by workers' compensation, as provided for in title
62; or
(7) Was incorrect because the provider or the member was already paid for the medical
services identified in the claim.

26.170.37 2 1292
A violation of this section is subject to enforcement by the Division of Insurance
under title 58.
For purposes of this section, "medical services," do not include dental services,
pharmaceutical services, or the provision of prescription drug products or supplies.
For purposes of this section, "retroactively deny a previously paid claim" means to
retroactively collect claim payments made to a provider by requiring repayment of the
payments, reducing other payments currently owed to the provider, withholding or setting
off against future payments, or reducing or affecting the future claim payments to the
provider in any other manner.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
A payment remitted by the provider to the health carrier, as provided for in section
1 of this Act, must be in the amount originally paid by the carrier and may not include any
additional fees, penalties, or interest.
Section 3. This Act is applicable to claims for medical services provided on or after July 1,
2026.
HB1292 ENROLLED

26.170.37 3 1292
An Act to limit the ability of a health carrier to recoup, recover, or retroactively deny previously
paid claims.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1292
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1292 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1292 ENROLLED